District of Columbia statutes.
16-4603.13

Recognition and enforcement.

A court of the District shall accord full faith and credit to an order issued by a court of another state and consistent with this chapter which enforces a child-custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under subchapter II of this chapter.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 313 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).